Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 80. General Provisions.

Sec. 15.80.005.
Readability of certain election materials.

The policy of the state is to prepare a ballot proposition that is clear, concise, and easily readable. The form of each ballot proposition shall be scored under (c) of this section. The policy of the state is to prepare a ballot proposition that is scored at approximately 60.

Each neutral summary prepared for the voter’s pamphlet shall be scored under (c) of this section. The policy of the state is to prepare a neutral summary that is scored at approximately 60.

A ballot proposition or neutral summary shall be scored using the following procedures:

disregard numbers;

multiply the average sentence length in words by 1.015;

multiply the average number of syllables for each 100 words by .846;

subtract the total of (2) and (3) from 206.835.

A court may not enjoin the conduct or results of an election for a failure to comply with (a) or (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 104 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

15.60.005

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 15.80.007.
Sale of voter registration and election management software.

The director may sell voter registration and election management system data processing software.

History.

(§ 18 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 15.60.007.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 15.80.008.
Recognized political party status.

A political group that the director has not recognized as a political party may obtain recognized political party status if, on or before May 31 of the election year for which the political group seeks recognition, the political group

files an application with the director;

submits bylaws to the director and the United States Department of Justice as required of political parties in AS

15.25.014

; and

meets the definition of a political party in AS

15.80.010

.

The director shall verify that each political group seeking recognized political party status under (a) of this section and each recognized political party meets the definition of a political party in AS

15.80.010

.

The director shall perform a verification described in (b) of this section at least once a month after the date of certification of the preceding general election, except that the director may suspend the monthly verifications on and after June 1 and before November 30 of a general election year. For purposes of (b) of this section, the director shall verify that the voters who have submitted registration forms to the division of elections are qualified under AS

15.05.010

and have declared affiliation with the political group or recognized political party for which the verification is performed.

Within 10 days after a verification under (c) of this section, the director shall provide to a political group seeking recognized political party status under (a) of this section written notification when the political group has obtained recognized political party status.

The director may not withdraw recognized political party status from a political group that no longer qualifies as a political party until after the first verification after a general election at which a governor was elected. The director shall notify the political group in writing of the withdrawal of recognition.

History.

(§ 56 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 15.60.008.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” in (a)(3) and (b) of this section to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

Editor's notes. —

Paragraph (a)(2) refers to AS

15.25.014

, which was repealed by § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2.

Sec. 15.80.010.
Definitions.

In this title, unless the context otherwise requires,

“absent uniformed services voter” has the meaning given in 52 U.S.C. 20310;

“absentee voting official” means a person appointed to serve as an absentee voting official in accordance with AS

15.20.045

;

“ballot” means any document provided by the director on which votes may be cast for candidates, propositions, or questions;

“director” means the director of elections who is the chief elections officer of the state appointed in accordance with AS

15.10.105(a)

;

“division” means the division of elections created under AS

15.10.105

;

“election board” means the board appointed in accordance with AS

15.10.120

;

“election official” means election board members, members of counting or review boards, employees of the division of elections, and absentee voting officials;

“electronically generated ballot” means any ballot other than a paper ballot that is physically marked by the voter using a writing instrument or a mechanical device;

“federal election” means a general, special, special primary, or primary election held solely or in part for the purpose of selecting, nominating, or electing a candidate for the office of President, Vice-President, presidential elector, United States senator, or United States representative;

“felony involving moral turpitude” includes those crimes that are immoral or wrong in themselves such as murder, manslaughter, assault, sexual assault, sexual abuse of a minor, unlawful exploitation of a minor, robbery, extortion, coercion, kidnapping, incest, arson, burglary, theft, forgery, criminal possession of a forgery device, offering a false instrument for recording, scheme to defraud, falsifying business records, commercial bribe receiving, commercial bribery, bribery, receiving a bribe, perjury, perjury by inconsistent statements, endangering the welfare of a minor, escape, promoting contraband, interference with official proceedings, receiving a bribe by a witness or a juror, jury tampering, misconduct by a juror, tampering with physical evidence, hindering prosecution, terroristic threatening, riot, criminal possession of explosives, unlawful furnishing of explosives, sex trafficking, criminal mischief, misconduct involving a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance, permitting an escape, promoting gambling, possession of gambling records, distribution of child pornography, and possession of child pornography;

“general election” means the election held on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered years;

“hand-counted ballot” means a ballot designated to be counted by hand in precincts where precinct tabulators are not available;

“house district” means one of the districts described in art. VI, sec. 1, Constitution of the State of Alaska;

“judicial district” means one of the districts defined in AS

22.10.010

;

“lieutenant governor” includes an appointed lieutenant governor, governor, or acting governor if a vacancy has occurred in the office of lieutenant governor or governor;

“limited political party” means a political group which organizes for the purpose of selecting candidates for electors for President and Vice-President;

“local election” means a regular or special election held by a borough, city, school district, or regional educational attendance area;

“master register” means the list of all registered voters in the state which is maintained by the director of elections;

“member of a political party” means a person who supports the political program of a party;

“numerical identifier” means a voter’s date of birth, the last four digits of a voter’s social security number, a voter’s Alaska driver’s license number, or a voter’s Alaska identification card number or voter identification number;

“oath” includes affirmation;

“official registration list” means the list of all voters qualified to vote at a particular election compiled in accordance with AS

15.07.125

;

“optically scanned ballot” means a paper ballot designed to be read by an optical scanning machine;

“overseas voter” has the meaning given in 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6;

“party district committee” means the political party committee that performs the executive function for a region representing an area larger than a precinct and smaller than the state;

“political group” means a group of organized voters which represents a political program and which does not qualify as a political party;

“political party” means an organized group of voters that represents a political program and

that has registered voters in the state equal in number to at least three percent of the total votes cast for governor at the preceding general election;

if the office of governor was not on the ballot at the preceding general election but the office of United States senator was on that ballot, that has registered voters in the state equal in number to at least three percent of the total votes cast for United States senator at that general election; or

if neither the office of governor nor the office of United States senator was on the ballot at the preceding general election, that has registered voters in the state equal in number to at least three percent of the total votes cast for United States representative at that general election;

“precinct” means the territory within which resident voters may cast votes at one polling place;

“precinct tabulators” means an electronic optical scanning ballot tabulation system or other tabulator designated by the director to electronically count ballots;

“presidential election year” means a year in which the presidential electors are elected;

“proposition” means an initiative, referendum, or constitutional amendment submitted at an election to the public for vote;

“qualified voter” means a person who has the qualification of a voter and is not disqualified as provided by art. V, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and AS

15.05.030

;

“question” means an issue placed on the ballot to determine whether a judge or justice shall be accepted or rejected, whether a constitutional convention shall be called, whether a state debt shall be contracted, or whether a state official shall be recalled;

“ranked-choice voting” means, in a general election, the method of casting and tabulating votes in which voters rank candidates in order of preference and in which tabulation proceeds in sequential rounds in which (A) a candidate with a majority in the first round wins outright, or (B) last-place candidates are defeated until there are two candidates remaining, at which point the candidate with the greatest number of votes is declared the winner of the election.

“registration official” includes an employee of the division of elections when performing the task of voter registration and a person appointed to serve as a registration official in accordance with AS

15.07.081

or

15.07.100

;

“reregistration” means the submission of a registration form by a voter whose registration was inactivated on the master register maintained under AS 15.07 and the director’s reactivation of that registration in accordance with that chapter; in this paragraph, “a voter whose registration was inactivated” does not include a voter whose registration was inactivated under AS

15.07.130

and whose ballot may be counted under AS

15.15.198

;

“senate district” means one of the districts described in art. VI, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska;

“signature” or “subscription” includes a mark intended as a signature or subscription;

“special election” means an election held at a time other than when the general or primary election is held and an election called to be held with, and at the time of, the general or primary election;

“special runoff election” means a runoff election for a United States senator or United States representative held because no candidate for the office received over 50 percent of the votes cast at the special election for that office;

“state chairperson ” or “state party chairperson” means the political party official elected as the highest ranking statewide party executive;

“sworn” includes affirmed;

“unconditional discharge” means that a person is released from all disability arising under a conviction and sentence, including probation and parole;

“vacancy” exists in an office when the person elected or appointed to the office resigns, retires, dies, is recalled, is rejected by majority vote on the question at an election, is convicted of a corrupt practice, is removed by impeachment, or is expelled;

“voter” means a person who presents oneself for the purpose of voting either in person or by absentee ballot;

“voter registration agency” means an agency designated in or under AS

15.07.055

.

History.

(§ 12.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 29 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 207 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 64 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 44 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1997; am §§ 66, 67, 102 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 76 — 83, 92 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 50 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 154 SLA 2004; am § 57 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 15 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 22 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am §§ 41, 42 ch 73 SLA 2013; am § 54 ch 13 SLA 2019; §§ 68 — 70, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1988, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2013, and 2020.

The amendment made by sec. 66,
ch. 21, SLA
2000 was not given effect because the amendment made by sec. 81,
ch. 82, SLA 2000, substantially incorporated the changes made by the earlier enactment.

Formerly AS 15.60.010.
Renumbered in 2010.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in the definition of “federal election”, inserted “special runoff,” preceding “or primary election”; added definitions for “absent uniformed services voter”, “overseas voter”, and “special runoff election”.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (1), substituted “52 U.S.C. 20310” for “42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6” at the end.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (9), substituted “special primary” for “special runoff” preceding “, or primary election”; in (27)(A), deleted “nominated a candidate for governor who received at least three percent of the total votes cast for governor at the preceding general election or” following “that”, in (27)(B), deleted “nominated a candidate for United States senator who received at least three percent of the total votes cast for United States senator at that general election or” following “that”, in (27)(C), deleted “nominated a candidate for United States representative who received at least three percent of the total votes cast for United States representative at that general election or” following “that”; added (46) [now (34)].

Editor's notes. —

Section 27(a),
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendment to paragraph (9) applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

This section refers to 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6, which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 20310, by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For a list of crimes which constitute felonies involving moral turpitude, see Nov. 7, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 15.80.020.
Short title.

AS 15.05 — AS 15.80 may be cited as the Alaska Election Code.

History.

(§ 12.02 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 15.60.020; renumbered in 2010, at which time an internal reference to “AS 15.60” was conformed to “AS 15.80”.